District of Columbia statutes.
38-1803.12

Consultation.

The World Class Schools Task Force shall conduct its duties under this part in consultation with:

(1)

The District of Columbia Goals Panel;

(2)

Officials of the District of Columbia public schools who have been identified by the Superintendent as having responsibilities relevant to this part, including the Deputy Superintendent for Curriculum;

(3)

The District of Columbia community, with particular attention given to educators, and parent and business organizations; and

(4)

Any other persons or groups that the task force deems appropriate.

Apr. 26, 1996, 110 Stat. 1321 [255], Pub. L. 104-134, § 2312
1981 Ed., § 31-2853.32.